Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 3 Salt-water Fishing

27-4-110.
Commercial fishing license required.

It shall be unlawful for any person other than the crew of a trawler licensed as provided in Code Section 27-2-8 with a trawler crew license, for purposes of such license, or a person in possession of a valid commercial crabbing license as provided for in Code Section 27-4-150, for purposes of such license, or a person in possession of a commercial food shrimp cast netting license as provided in Code Section 27-4-205, for purposes of such license, to engage in commercial fishing in any of the salt waters of this state without first obtaining a commercial fishing license, which shall be carried on his or her person while engaging in such activities. Each license shall be separate and distinct from each other and separate from and in addition to the commercial fishing boat license required by Code Section 27-2-8.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 37; Ga. L. 1956, p. 590, § 3; Ga. L. 1967, p. 634, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 424, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-306, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 27; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1012, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 156, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 5; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 4/HB 100; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 15/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “the crew of a trawler licensed as provided in Code Section 27-2-8 with a trawler crew license, for purposes of such license, or” near the beginning of the first sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

27-4-111.
Filing of bond or affidavit as condition for validity of commercial fishing boat license.

A commercial fishing boat license issued under Code Section 27-2-8 shall not be valid unless there is in effect in the name of the owner of the boat one of the following:

A cash forfeiture bond meeting the requirements of Code Section 27-4-134 sufficient to cover the forfeiture prescribed by law for the next offense; or

A forfeiture bond executed by a bonding, surety, or insurance company meeting the requirements of Code Section 27-4-134 sufficient to cover the forfeiture prescribed by law for the next offense; or

An affidavit meeting the requirements of Code Section 27-4-134.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-906, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-112 through 27-4-115.
[Reserved]

History.

Code 1933, §§ 45-812, 45-813, 45-814, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-818, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 34; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, §§ 60, 61, 62; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 32; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1003, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1047, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 6; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, §§ 5, 6/HB 100; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, §§ 13-16/HB 869, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, §§ 13-16/HB 869 repealed and reserved these Code sections, effective January 1, 2013.

27-4-116.
[Reserved] Diamondback terrapins.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 634, §§ 1-4; Code 1933, § 45-816, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 7; repealed by Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 13, effective July 1, 2003.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 13 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2003.

27-4-117.
Identification tags, numbers, and letters for boats or vessels.

It shall be unlawful for any boat or vessel licensed by the department pursuant to Code Section 27-2-8 to fail to have fixed securely on each side of the bow or pilothouse thereof, and displayed conspicuously in order that it may be read from a reasonable distance, a tag furnished by the department. It shall also be unlawful for any boat or vessel so licensed to fail to have painted upon the boat or vessel, in a size and upon such part as may be prescribed by the department, such numbers and letters to identify the boat or vessel. The paint used for such purpose shall be different from and in clear contrast in color to the boat or vessel on which applied. The numbers and letters so painted on the boat or vessel shall not be covered at any time while the boat or vessel is trawling, fishing, or taking any seafood.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 339, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Code 1933, § 45-212; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 35; Ga. L. 1967, p. 634, § 5; Ga. L. 1968, p. 202, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-311, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

Cross references.

Numbering requirements for watercraft generally, § 52-7-5 et seq.

Attachment of capacity plates to watercraft, § 52-7-40 et seq.

27-4-118.
Required records.

It shall be unlawful for any person landing seafood in this state to fail to maintain at all times a record book showing the amount of seafood landed per trip; the name and address of the person or persons to whom sold; the date of sale and the time and place of delivery; and such other information as may be required by the department.

Each person required to maintain records pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall report such information to the department, whose address for the purpose of reporting shall be the Coastal Resource Division headquarters, at such times and in such manner as the board provides by rule or regulation.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 339, § 2; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 25; Code 1933, § 45-215; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 36; Code 1933, § 45-910, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 693, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 7; Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 7/HB 100; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 17/HB 869.

27-4-119.
[Repealed] Lawful commercial shrimping devices.

History.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 8; repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.